AnimWaNoun.lexc
!!!nouns.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +N +Anim +Inanim +Indef +Nom +Acc +Dat +GenLoc +InstrAbl +Voc +Sg +Pl +Indef ^GUESSSTEMA ^GUESSSTEMAA ^GUESSSTEMC

LEXICON Root
AnimWaStem;

LEXICON AnimWaStem
කාන්තා AnimWaNoun;


LEXICON AnimWaNoun

+N+Acc+Sg+Anim:ව #;
+N+Dat+Indef+Sg:වට #;
+N+GenLoc+Indef+Sg:වක් #;
+N+GenLoc+Indef+Sg:වකු #;
+N+Dat+Indef+Sg:වකුට #;
+N+Dat+Indef+Sg:වකුහට #;
+N+Dat+Indef+Sg:වක්ට #;
+N+Dat+Indef+Sg:වක්හට #;
+N+GenLoc+Sg+Inanim:වකුගේ #;
+N+GenLoc+Sg+Inanim:වක්ගේ #;
+N+Acc+Pl+Anim:වෝ#;
+N+Dat+Pl+Anim:වෝට #;
+N+Dat+Pl+Anim:වෝහට #;
+N+Nom+Pl+Anim:වන් #;
+N+Dat+Pl+Inanim:වන්ට #;
+N+Dat+Pl+Inanim:වන්හට #;
+N+GenLoc+Pl+Inanim:වන්ගේ #;
+N+GenLoc+Pl+Anim:වෝගේ #;
+N+GenLoc+Pl+Inanim:වන්ගෙන් #;
+N+GenLoc+Sg+Anim:වත් #;
+N+GenLoc+Pl+Anim:වෝත් #;
+N+Nom+Indef+Sg:වම #;
+N+Nom+Indef+Pl:වෝම #;
+N+Nom+Indef+Sg:වවත් #;
+N+Nom+Indef+Pl:වෝවත් #;
+N+Voc+Indef+Pl:වනි #;
